Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2530.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-23.7-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-23.7 entitled "Biodiesel
Products" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-23.7-4. Heating oil biobased products.
Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, and in accordance with
the compliance schedule established in this chapter, all No. 2 distillate heating oil sold in the state
for residential, commercial, or industrial uses within the state, shall contain, at a minimum, the
specified percentage of biobased product, unless the requirement has been suspended pursuant to
§ 23-23.7-7. The compliance schedule shall be as follows:
(1) Not later than July 1, 2014, all No. 2 distillate heating oil sold in the state shall contain
not less than two percent (2%) of a biobased product.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2015, all No. 2 distillate heating oil sold in the state shall contain
not less than three percent (3%) of a biobased product.
(3) Not later than July 1, 2016, all No. 2 distillate heating oil sold in the state shall contain
not less than four percent (4%) of a biobased product.
(4) Not later than July 1, 2017, all No. 2 distillate heating oil sold in the state shall contain
not less than five percent (5%) of a biobased product.
(5) Not later than July 1, 2021, all No. 2 distillate heating oil sold in the state shall at a
minimum meet the standards for B5 biodiesel blend and/or renewable hydrocarbon diesel.
(6) Not later than July 1, 2023, all No. 2 distillate heating oil sold in the state shall at a

minimum meet the standards for B10 biodiesel blend and/or renewable hydrocarbon diesel.
(7) Not later than July 1, 2025 2030, all No. 2 distillate heating oil sold in the state shall at
a minimum meet the standards for B20 biodiesel blend and/or renewable hydrocarbon diesel.
(8) Not later than July 1, 2030 2035, all No. 2 distillate heating oil sold in the state shall at
a minimum meet the standards for B50 biodiesel blend and/or renewable hydrocarbon diesel.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004868
========
LC004868 - Page 2 of 3